Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2613
Required records.

(1) An athlete agent shall retain the
following records for a period of five years:

(a) The name and address
of each individual represented by the athlete agent;

(b) Any agency contract entered
into by the athlete agent; and

(c) Any direct costs incurred by the athlete agent
in the recruitment or solicitation of a student-athlete to enter into an agency
contract.

(2)
Records required by subsection (1) of this section to be retained are open
to inspection by the Secretary of State during normal business hours.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 13.